vi: Thiết kế tấm mặt: Có thể tháo rời; Cố định; Khác
zh-CN: 面板设计: 可拆卸; 固定; 其他
tr: Ön yüz tasarımı: Çıkarılabilir; Sabit; Diğer
hu: Előlap kialakítása: Levehető; Rögzített; Egyéb
ja: 前面プレートの設計: 取り外し可能; 固定; その他
sl-SI: Zasnova čelne plošče: Snemljiva; Fiksna; Drugo
de: Frontplattendesign: Abnehmbar; Befestigt; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Dizajn čelnej dosky: Snímateľný; Korigujúci; Iné
ko: 페이스플레이트 디자인: 분리 가능; 고정; 기타
lt-LT: Priekinio skydelio dizainas: Nuimama; Fiksuota; Kita
pl: Konstrukcja płyty czołowej: Odczepiana; Stałe; Inne
fr: Conception de la façade: Amovible; Fixé; Autre
pt-PT: Design do painel frontal: Destacável; Fixo; Outro
ru: Тип лицевой панели: Съемная; Несъемная; Другой
nl: Ontwerp wijzerplaat: Afneembaar; Vast; Andere
pt-BR: Design do painel frontal: Removível; Fixo; Outro
sv: Design på frontplatta: Löstagbar; Fast; Övrigt
bg-BG: Дизайн на панелите: Сваляща се; Фиксирано; Други
hr-HR: Dizajn prednje ploče: Odvojivo; Fiksno; Ostalo
es: Diseño de la placa frontal: Desmontable; Fijo; Otros
nb: Frontplatedesign: Avtagbar; Fast; Annet
da: Design til ansigtsplade: Aftagelig; Fast; Andet
th: การออกแบบหน้ากาก: ถอดออกได้; แบบแช่น้ำยารักษาสภาพ; อื่นๆ
en: Faceplate design: Detachable; Fixed; Other
cs: Design čelní desky: Odnímatelné; Pevný; Jiné
fi: Etulevyn suunnittelu: Irrotettava; Pysyvä; Muu
ro-RO: Design placă frontală: Detașabilă; Fixă; Altele
el: Σχέδιο πρόσοψης: Αποσπώμενη; Σταθερή; Άλλο
it: Progettazione del frontalino: Staccabile; Fisso; Altro
zh-TW: 面板設計: 可拆式; 固定; 其他